Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-803
City or village bridge; vehicle exceeding maximum weight; claim or damages not allowed.

Any person owning, operating, or traveling in any vehicle which exceeds the maximum weight carrying capacity or load limit conspicuously posted or attached to any bridge within the jurisdiction or under the administration or control of any city or village shall not have a claim against or recover damages from such city or village for any claim or injury arising out of the vehicle being upon or crossing such bridge.

Laws 1990, LB 1077, § 1.